Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-258
Act, how cited.

Sections 86-258 to 86-270 shall be known and may be cited as the Intrastate Pay-Per-Call Regulation Act.

Laws 1993, LB 42, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1101;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 120.